Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB343.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2702(a)(2) and (b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and subsection (c) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2702. Aggravated assault.(a) Offense defined.--A person is guilty of aggravated assault if [he] the person:* * *(2) attempts to cause or intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes serious bodily injury to any of the officers, agents, employees or other persons enumerated in subsection (c) [or to an employee of an agency, company or other entity engaged in public transportation], while in the performance of duty;123456789101112131415161718 * * *(b) Grading.--Aggravated assault under subsection (a)(1), (2) [and] or (9) is a felony of the first degree. Aggravated assault under subsection (a)(3), (4), (5), (6), (7) [and] or (8) is a felony of the second degree.(c) Officers, employees, etc., enumerated.--The officers, agents, employees and other persons referred to in subsection (a) shall be as follows:* * *(40) An employee of an agency, company or other entity engaged in public transportation.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0343PN0280 - 2 - 12345678910111213